Hawaii statutes.
§431:10C-307 Reimbursement of duplicate
benefits. Whenever any person effects a tort liability recovery for
accidental harm, whether by suit or settlement, which duplicates personal
injury protection benefits already paid under the provisions of this article,
the motor vehicle insurer shall be reimbursed fifty per cent of the personal
injury protection benefits paid to or on behalf of the person receiving the
duplicate benefits up to the maximum limit. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L
1989, c 83, §1; am L 1997, c 251, §44; am L 1998, c 275, §24]

Case Notes

Cited: 73 H. 403, 833 P.2d 890.

Discussed: 76 H. 304, 875 P.2d 921.

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next